California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) The program shall provide a minimum of one meal per day which is of suitable quality and quantity as to supply at least one-third of the daily nutritional requirement, unless the participant declines the meal or medical contraindications exist, as documented in the participant’s health record, that prohibit the ingestion of the meal at the adult day health care center. Additionally, special diets and supplemental feedings shall be available if indicated.

(2) Dietary counseling and nutrition education for the participant and his or her family shall be a required adjunct of such service. Dietary counseling and nutrition education may be provided by a professional registered nurse, unless the participant is receiving a special diet prescribed by a physician, or a nurse determines that the services of a registered dietician are necessary.

(e) Psychiatric or psychological services which include consultation and individual assessment by a psychiatrist, clinical psychologist, or a psychiatric social worker, when indicated, and group or individual treatment for persons with diagnosed mental, emotional, or behavioral problems.

(f) Social work services to participants and their families to help with personal, family, and adjustment problems that interfere with the effectiveness of treatment.

(g) Planned recreational and social activities suited to the needs of the participants and designed to encourage physical exercise, to prevent deterioration, and to stimulate social interaction.

(h) Transportation service for participants, when needed, to and from their homes utilizing specially equipped vehicles to accommodate participants’ needs. The transportation service may only exceed one hour when necessary to ensure regular and planned attendance at the adult day health care center and when there is documentation in the participant’s health record that there is no medical contraindication.

(i) Written policies and procedures for dealing with natural disaster and emergency situations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 648, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14550.5.

Adult day health care centers shall offer, and provide directly on the premises, in accordance with the participant’s individual plan of care, and subject to authorization pursuant to Section 14526, the following core services to each participant during each day of the participant’s attendance at the center:

(a) One or more of the following professional nursing services:

(1) Observation, assessment, and monitoring of the participant’s general health status and changes in his or her condition, risk factors, and the participant’s specific medical, cognitive, or mental health condition or conditions upon which admission to the adult day health care center was based.

(2) Monitoring and assessment of the participant’s medication regimen, administration and recording of the participant’s prescribed medications, and intervention, as needed, based upon the assessment and the participant’s reactions to his or her medications.

(3) Oral or written communication with the participant’s personal health care provider, other qualified health care or social service provider, or the participant’s family or other caregiver, regarding changes in the participant’s condition, signs, or symptoms.

(4) Supervision of the provision of personal care services for the participant, and assistance, as needed.

(5) Provision of skilled nursing care and intervention, within scope of practice, to participants, as needed, based upon an assessment of the participant, his or her ability to provide self-care while at the adult day health care center, and any health care provider orders.

(b) One or both of the following core personal care services or social services:

(1) One or both of the following personal care services:

(A) Supervision of, or assistance with, activities of daily living or instrumental activities of daily living.

(B) Protective group supervision and interventions to assure participant safety and to minimize the risk of injury, accident, inappropriate behavior, or wandering.

(2) One or more of the following social services provided by the adult day health care center social worker or social worker assistant:

(A) Observation, assessment, and monitoring of the participant’s psychosocial status.

(B) Group work to address psychosocial issues.

(C) Care coordination.

(c) At least one of the following therapeutic activities provided by the adult day health care center activity coordinator or other trained adult day health care center personnel:

(1) Group or individual activities to enhance the social, physical, or cognitive functioning of the participant.

(2) Facilitated participation in group or individual activities for those participants whose frailty or cognitive functioning level precludes them from active participation in scheduled activities.

(d) One meal per day of attendance, in accordance with Section 54331 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, unless the participant declines the meal or medical contraindications exist, as documented in the participant’s health record, that prohibit the ingestion of the meal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 648, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Repealed as of date prescribed in Section 14550.6.   After repeal, see related provisions in Section 14550.6.)
-------------------------------------------

14550.6.

Adult day health care centers shall offer, and provide directly on the premises, in accordance with the participant’s individual plan of care, and subject to authorization pursuant to Section 14526.2, the following core services to each participant during each day of the participant’s attendance at the center:

(a) One or more of the following professional nursing services:

(1) Assessment and monitoring of the participant’s general health status and changes in his or her condition, risk factors, and the participant’s specific medical, cognitive, or mental health condition or conditions upon which admission to the adult day health care center was based.

(2) Monitoring and assessment of the participant’s medication regimen, administration and recording of the participant’s prescribed medications, and intervention, as needed, based upon professional assessment of the participant’s reactions to his or her medications.

(3) Oral or written communication with the participant’s personal health care provider, other qualified health care or social service provider, or the participant’s family or other caregiver, regarding changes in the participant’s condition, signs, or symptoms.

(4) Provision of skilled nursing care and intervention, within scope of practice, to participants, as needed, based upon an assessment of the participant, his or her ability to provide self-care while at the adult day health care center, and any health care provider orders.

(b) Personal care services or social services, or both, needed to address the person’s individual needs for benefits as required by Section 14525.1, as follows:

(1) Protective group supervision and interventions to ensure participant safety and to minimize the risk of injury, accident, inappropriate behavior, or wandering.

(2) Assessment, and monitoring of the participant’s psychosocial status provided by the adult day health care center social worker or social worker assistant.

(3) Group work to address psychosocial issues.

(c) At least one of the following therapeutic activities provided by the adult day health care center activity coordinator or other trained adult day health care center personnel:

(1) Group or individual activities to enhance the social, physical, or cognitive functioning of the participant.

(2) Facilitated participation in group or individual activities for those participants whose frailty or cognitive functioning level precludes them from active participation in scheduled activities.

(d) One meal per day of attendance, in accordance with Section 54331 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, unless the participant declines the meal or medical contraindications exist, as documented in the participant’s health record, that prohibit the ingestion of the meal.

(e) This section shall only be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions without taking further regulatory action.

(g) Upon the date of execution of the declaration described under subdivision (g) of Section 14525.1, this section shall become operative and Section 14550.5 shall become inoperative and on that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 56.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Section operative on date prescribed in subd. (g).)
-------------------------------------------

14551.

The following additional services may also be provided:

(a) Podiatric services provided or arranged for, or under direction of, the supervising physician.

(b) Optometric screening and advice for low-vision cases by a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist.

(c) Dental screening for the purpose of apprising the participant of the necessity of regular or emergency dental care.

(d) Such other services within the concept and objectives of adult day health care as may be approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.

In order to obtain certification as a provider of adult day health care under this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), the following standards shall be met:

(a) The provider shall have met all other requirements of licensure as an adult day health care center pursuant to Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The provider shall comply with requirements of this chapter regarding program and scope of services.

(c) The provider shall have appropriate licensed personnel.

(d) The provider shall employ required personnel for furnishing of required services pursuant to Section 14550 consistent with commonly accepted professional standards.

(e) The provider shall afford to each participant all rights, including the right to be free from harm and abuse, identified in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1580 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) A provider serving a substantial number of participants of a particular racial or ethnic group, or participants whose primary language is not English, shall employ staff who can meet the cultural and linguistic needs of the participant population.

(g) A provider shall have organizational and administrative capacity to provide services under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.2.

(a) “Program plan” means a written description of the adult day health care center’s philosophy, objectives, and processes for providing required services to the participant populations.

(b) The program plan shall include any of the following elements, as requested by the California Department of Aging, and shall be submitted as required in Section 14574.1:

(1) The total number of participants the center proposes to serve, or currently serves, daily.

(2) A profile of the participant population the center proposes to serve, or currently serves, that includes a description of the specific medical, social, and other needs of each population.

(3) A description of the specific program elements and services that addresses the medical, social, and other needs of each participant population that the center proposes to serve, or currently serves, as specified in paragraph (2). “Program elements” means the components of an adult day health care program, as specified in Section 14550.

(4) A description of the specialized professional and program staff that will provide, or currently provide, the adult day health care center’s program services, as specified in paragraph (3), and that staff’s responsibilities. The plan shall demonstrate that the adult day health care center is organized and staffed to carry out the requirements as specified in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1580 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) An in-service training plan for each center staff member to commence within the first six months of employment. The training plan shall address, at a minimum, the specific medical, social, and other needs of each participant population the center proposes to serve, as specified in paragraph (2).

(6) A sample individual plan of care for each specialty population the adult day health care center proposes to serve, or currently serves, and a sample of a one-week schedule of daily program services for each sample individual plan of care. The individual plan of care shall demonstrate the specific medical, social, and other needs of each participant population the adult day health center proposes to serve.

(7) A plan for a behavior modification program if such a program will be used as a basic intervention for meeting the needs of a special population, such as persons with developmental disabilities or persons with mental disabilities.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent funds are made available for the purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(d) The implementation of the program plan requirements does not require adoption of regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 797, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.5.

Pursuant to Section 14043.46, the department may implement a one-year moratorium on the certification and enrollment into the Medi-Cal program of new adult day health care centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 26.1.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14553.

An adult day health care provider shall establish written policies and procedures, which shall have prior approval of the department, unless otherwise specified in an interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code, for continuously reviewing the quality of care, performance of all personnel, the utilization of services and facilities, and costs. Information derived from the review shall be made available to the department, unless otherwise specified in an interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 681, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14553.1.

The adult day health care center’s policies and procedures shall include provisions for the following:

(a) Designating the staff who will serve in the required positions during a short-term absence or short-term vacancy, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code, of required staff.

(b) Providing coverage for required staff in the event of a long-term absence or long-term vacancy, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Ensuring continuity of services for participants during staff absences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 648, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14554.

The adult day health care provider shall maintain a complete standard medical record for each participant, including records of treatment rendered by a subcontractor, according to specifications established by the department and as may be further specified by the California Department of Aging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 681, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14555.

Each adult day health care provider shall establish a grievance procedure under which participants may submit their grievances. Such procedure shall be approved by the department prior to the approval of the certification. The department shall establish standards for such procedures to insure adequate consideration and rectification of participant grievances. A provider shall make written findings of fact in the case of each grievance processed, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the participant. If the Medi-Cal participant has an unresolved grievance, the fair hearing provided in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2 of this division shall be available to resolve all grievances regarding care and administration by the adult day health care provider. The findings and recommendations of the department, based on the decision of the hearing officer, shall be binding upon the adult day health care provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 151, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [14570. - 14577.]

14570.

(a) The department shall adopt all necessary rules and regulations providing for quality of care and payment for services rendered under this chapter pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000). All regulations heretofore adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter, and that are in effect immediately preceding the operative date of the amendment of this section enacted by the Legislature during the 1977–78 Regular Session, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the director.

(b) The director shall establish a distinct organizational entity within the department that shall have primary responsibility for the Adult Day Health Care Medi-Cal program. This entity shall coordinate and direct all departmental activities required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 681, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.

The department, in consultation with the California Association for Adult Day Services, shall develop a rate methodology. The methodology shall take into consideration all allowable costs associated with providing adult day health care services. Once a methodology has been approved by the department, it shall be the basis of future annual rate reviews.

Payment shall be for services provided in accordance with an approved individual plan of care. Billing shall be submitted directly to the department. Additionally, the department shall establish a separately billable and reasonable rate of reimbursement for the initial assessment that takes into account the intensity of services and the skill level of the health professionals required to conduct the mandated three-day assessment of new participant needs and living environment. Subsequent assessments, as needed or required, shall be billed at a lesser amount. The department shall establish utilization controls for assessment days to ensure the appropriate use of assessment and reassessment activity.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from entering into specific prospective budgeting and reimbursement agreements with providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 691, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Adult day health care is a necessary component in achieving an integrated home- and community-based long-term care system consistent with the principles of the decision of the United States Supreme Court in Olmstead v. L.C. by Zimring (1999) 527 U.S. 581.

(b) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services has directed the State of California to segregate certain skilled services from the all-inclusive per diem rate currently in use for adult day health care centers and to bill for those services using separate billing codes and reimbursement rates.

(c) The reimbursement methodology for adult day health care services that is established by the department should provide for fair and equitable reimbursement to adult day health care centers for services that are provided to each participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 691, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.2.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall establish, effective August 1, 2012, a reimbursement methodology and a reimbursement limit for adult day health care services on a prospective cost basis for services that are provided to each participant, pursuant to his or her individual plan of care. The prospective reimbursement methodology shall be determined by the department after consultation with the California Association for Adult Day Services and other interested stakeholders.

(b) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Daily core services” means the services described in Section 14550.5.

(2) “Separately billable services” means services designated by the department, after consultation with the California Association for Adult Day Services, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Physical therapy services.

(B) Occupational therapy services.

(C) Speech and language pathology services.

(D) Mental health services.

(E) Registered dietician services.

(F) Transportation services.

(c) The prospective reimbursement methodology for the daily core services provided by each
 adult day health care center shall be determined by the department based on the reasonable cost of providing all of the adult day health care services included within the core services and adjusted to the particular rate year. Services and costs included in the calculation of the daily core services rate shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Fixed or capital-related costs representing depreciation, leases and rentals, interest, leasehold improvements, and other amortization.

(2) Labor costs other than those for the separately billable services, including direct and indirect labor and contracted staff hours required by law or regulation.

(3) All other costs exclusive of fixed or capital-related costs, leases or rentals, interest, leasehold improvements, and other amortization.

(4) Add-ons, adjustments, and audit adjustments determined annually in the calculation of the core rate to allow for changes specified in subdivision (h), until those changes are reflected in the cost report.

(5) Cost components required to comply with licensing and certification laws and regulations.

(d) (1) The daily reimbursement rates for the separately billable services shall be determined based upon the reasonable cost of providing each service, how each of the individual billable services is defined, and which professional is providing the service, subject to the scope of his or her license. These reimbursement rates shall not exceed the Medi-Cal rates for the same service on file at the time the service is rendered.

(2) In
 establishing the total reimbursement limit, direct patient care labor costs may be paid at a specified discrete percentile to ensure maintenance of quality of care.

(e) The department shall determine a reimbursement limit applicable to each adult day health center peer group established pursuant to subdivision (m), taking into account total overall average costs per day of attendance for providing the entire array of adult day health care services, including the daily core services and the separately billable services. The department shall determine a reimbursement limit applicable to each adult day health care center peer group established pursuant to subdivision (m) based on cost containment principles applied to other acute care and long-term care providers.

(f) By July 1, 2010, the department shall develop, after consultation with the California Association for Adult Day
 Services, all of the following:

(1) An adult day health care center cost report meeting the requirements of subdivision (j) and a list of individual components to be included in the core rate calculation.

(2) The methodology and documentation necessary to establish the reimbursement rate for the separately billable services.

(3) The reimbursement rates for transportation services. Payments for transportation services shall be subject to the limit on the daily reimbursement and shall be reimbursed whether the center provides transportation directly, by use of contracted transportation, or both. The department shall review methodologies for payment for transportation services. The review of payment methodologies shall include a survey of other states’ adult day health care transportation systems, and transportation
 reports or expert consultation relevant to nonemergency medical transportation services in the community.

(g) (1) By January 1, 2011, the department shall facilitate the training of providers in collaboration with the California Association for Adult Day Services. The adult day health care centers shall be trained in the all of the following elements:

(A) The use of the modified cost report, supplemental reports, and the accounting and reporting manual.

(B) Plan of care documentation required to support the separately billable rate components.

(C) Medical necessity and eligibility requirements and documentation.

(2) By January 1, 2011, the department, after
 consultation with the California Association for Adult Day Services, shall establish facility peer groupings as specified in subdivision (m).

(h) By July 1, 2011, the department, after consultation with the California Association for Adult Day Services, shall establish a methodology for calculation of the reimbursement limit, rates for the daily core services, and applicable percentiles limiting specific cost categories within the core rate.

(i) (1) By March 30, 2012, a preliminary estimate of the reimbursement limit, the reimbursement rate for individual adult health care services, and separately billable services shall be established and provided to the California Association for Adult Day Services and other interested stakeholders. The department shall allow an appropriate stakeholder comment period following this action.

(2) The information supplied to all interested stakeholders in paragraph (1) shall be compared to what would have been paid under the rate methodology in effect for the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(3) Based on the rate comparisons, a methodology to provide for a multiyear phase in of the new prospective payment may be implemented.

(4) At the time of implementation, no adult day health care center’s payment shall be decreased by more than 10 percent below the rate paid in the rate year immediately preceding the first year that the rate methodology prescribed in this section is implemented. In the second and third rate years, no adult day health care center reimbursement rate shall be decreased by more than 10 percent below the adult day health care center’s reimbursement rate on file at the time of the application of the next
 year’s reimbursement rate.

(j) (1) The department, with input from the California Association for Adult Day Services and all interested stakeholders, shall develop the cost reporting form and determine the costs that are to be included and excluded from the annual cost reporting methodology.

(2) Cost reporting shall be consistent with Section 1861 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395x) and Part 413 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Cost reporting shall include itemization of the costs of all adult day health care services such that information necessary to determine costs associated with the core bundle of services and each of the separately billable services can be collected.

(4) The cost
 report or supplemental report to the cost report, as determined by the frequency the data will be required for calculation of the core rate, shall collect staffing level and salary data for all direct and indirect patient care staff, arranged through either employment or contract.

(5) All adult day health care centers participating in the Medi-Cal program shall maintain books and records according to generally accepted accounting principles and the uniform accounting systems adopted by the state, and shall submit annual cost reports directly to the department.

(k) (1) The department may exclude any cost report or portion thereof that it deems to be inaccurate, incomplete, or unrepresentative, consistent with the policies established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j). For facilities that fail to file cost reports with the department pursuant to this section,
 the department shall reimburse those facilities at 10 percent below the lowest reimbursement limit established in the facility’s peer group pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) Cost report data shall be validated by using comparisons to salary surveys and health industry administrative data maintained by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development and other state agencies. If cost report data is not statistically valid for a given peer group, survey statistics shall be used as a proxy to substitute for the cost report data.

(3) Cost report data for any adult day health care center that has closed or is no longer a Medi-Cal participating facility shall be excluded from the rate calculation.

(4) The specific process for maintaining cost data and submitting cost reports shall be developed after consultation with
 the California Association for Adult Day Services.

(l) Field audits shall be performed by the department in accordance with all of the following laws and regulations:

(1) Section 1861 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395x) and Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(2) Sections 413.9, 433.32, and 483.10 of, Part 413 of, Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Publication 15-1 (federal Department of Health and Human Services Manual).

(4) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 3 of, and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 78001) of Division 5 of, Title 22 of the California Code of
 Regulations.

(5) Sections 14170 and 14171.

(6) Relevant portions of the California Medicaid State Plan.

(m) (1) In accordance with field audit requirements, adult day health care centers shall be placed in a minimum of three designated peer groupings. Each adult day health care center in each of the designated peer groupings shall be audited on an annual basis.

(2) If for any reason a field audit was not performed, the average audit adjustment of the peer grouping shall be applied.

(3) The peer groupings shall include, at minimum, geographic differences and size of facility. The need for additional groupings shall be periodically reevaluated to ensure that the peer
 groupings remain relevant on a statewide basis.

(4) The department shall analyze and evaluate the data obtained through peer grouping analysis in order to determine if additional peer groupings or data elements are necessary for refinement of the peer groupings.

(5) After analyzing the data pursuant to paragraph (4), the department may increase the number of peer groupings or change the criteria to reflect pertinent factors affecting peer grouping costs.

(n) (1) An audit adjustment or adjustments, either specific to an adult day health care center or by peer grouping, reflecting the difference between reported and audited costs and participant days for field audited centers, shall be applied to all adult day health care centers for purposes of establishing the core services reimbursement rate
 and the reimbursement limit for the following rate year. Audit adjustments shall include all of the following:

(A) The results of settled appeals. The department shall consider only the findings of audit appeal reports that are issued more than 180 days prior to the beginning of the new rate year.

(B) In the case of peer grouping audit adjustments, audited costs shall be modified by a factor reflecting share-of-cost overpayments and share-of-cost underpayments.

(C) The results of federal audits, when reported to the state, shall be applied in determining audit adjustments.

(D) (i) An adjustment or adjustments to reported costs of adult day health care centers shall be made to reflect changes in state or federal laws and regulations
 that would affect those costs, including increases in the minimum wage or increases in minimum staffing requirements.

(ii) The costs described in clause (i) shall be reflected as an add-on to the new rate or rates.

(iii) To the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulations, add-ons to the rate or rates shall continue until those costs are included in cost reports used to set the new rate or rates.

(2) Adjusted costs shall be divided into categories and treated as follows:

(A) Fixed or capital-related costs shall include costs that represent depreciation, leases and rentals, interest, leasehold improvements, and other amortization. No update shall be applied.

(B) Property taxes, where
 identified, shall be updated at a rate of 2 percent annually.

(C) Labor costs, which shall be defined as a ratio of salary, wage, and benefits costs to the total costs of each adult day health care center, shall be updated based upon the labor study conducted by the department and using industry-specific wage data as reported by the adult day health care centers. The separately billable services shall be updated by applying the median market-based rate specific to the specialty service category.

(D) All other costs shall include all other costs less fixed or capital-related costs, property taxes, and labor costs. This cost category shall be updated using the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) Prior to the implementation of this methodology, the department shall take measures to ensure appropriate training of state
 audit staff.

(o) The department shall provide updates on the rate methodology to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The appropriation for services paid under this rate methodology shall be included in the annual Budget Act.

(p) Adult day health care centers may appeal findings that result in an adjustment to the rate or rates pursuant to Section 14171 and to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 51016) of Chapter 3 of Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(q) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction without taking regulatory action. By August 1, 2015, the department
 shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The department shall notify and consult with interested stakeholders in implementing, interpreting, or making specific the provisions described in this section.

(r) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that federal financial participation is obtained.

(s) The department may file a state plan amendment to implement the requirements of this section. Immediately upon filing any such state plan amendment, the department shall provide the fiscal committees of the Legislature with a copy of the state plan amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 165, Sec. 3.   (SB 117)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.5.

Federally qualified health centers shall be reimbursed on a prospective payment system rate basis pursuant to Section 14132.100 for the provision of adult day health care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 691, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14572.

(a) No Medi-Cal reimbursement shall be made for a service rendered by an adult day health care provider that does not have a license as an adult day health care center or that does not have currently effective Medi-Cal certification pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Medi-Cal certification shall be granted as of the date of licensure with respect to, and reimbursement shall be made for, a service rendered on or after that date if the provider meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is exempt from the moratorium imposed on the certification and enrollment of new adult day health care centers pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14043.46.

(2) Meets all certification requirements for adult day health care centers, and is enrolled as a Medi-Cal provider.

(3) Provides services in compliance with the requirements of this chapter as of the date the center began providing services to beneficiaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 70.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.

(a) Initial Medi-Cal certification for adult day health care providers shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance. The director shall specify any date he or she determines is reasonably necessary because of the record of the applicant and to carry out the purposes of this chapter, but not more than 24 months from the date of issuance, when renewal of the certification shall expire. The certification may be extended for periods of not more than 60 days if the department determines it to be necessary.

(b) Before certification renewal the provider shall submit with the application for renewal a report according to department specifications that includes an analysis of income and expenditures, continued demonstrated community need, services, participant statistics and outcome, and adherence to policies and procedures.

(c) Prior to approving renewal of Medi-Cal certification, the California Department of Aging shall conduct a financial review and onsite medical and management reviews. The reviews shall be conducted by a team of persons with appropriate technical skills. The management review shall be performed by the entity responsible for directing and coordinating the program, as specified in the interagency agreement entered into pursuant to Section 1572 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Where the director determines that the public interests would be served thereby, a public hearing may be held on any renewal application subject to this section. The findings of the departmental program and licensing reviews and the provider’s annual evaluation report shall be presented at the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 797, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14574.

(a) The director shall terminate the Medi-Cal certification of any adult day health care provider at any time if he or she finds the provider is not in compliance with standards prescribed by this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or regulations adopted pursuant to these chapters. The director shall give reasonable notice of his or her intention to terminate the certification to the provider and participants in the center. The notice shall state the effective date of, and the reason for, the termination.

(b) The California Department of Aging and the department shall coordinate proceedings to deny an application for certification, to terminate or suspend